Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.540

Community juvenile accountability programs—Information collection—Report.

(1) Each community juvenile accountability program approved and funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540 shall comply with the information collection requirements in subsection (2) of this section and the reporting requirements in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) The information collected by each community juvenile accountability program must include, at a minimum for each juvenile participant: (a) The name, date of birth, gender, social security number, and, when available, the juvenile information system (JUVIS) control number; (b) an initial intake assessment of each juvenile participating in the program; (c) a list of all juveniles who completed the program; and (d) an assessment upon completion or termination of each juvenile, including outcomes and, where applicable, reasons for termination.

(3) The department shall annually compile the data and report to the legislature on: (a) The programs funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540; (b) the total cost for each funded program and cost per juvenile; and (c) the essential elements of the program.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 623; 1997 c 338 s 64.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338 ss 60-64: See note following RCW 13.40.500.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.